Connecticut, session 2026, SB00124.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 7-127b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The chief elected official or the chief executive officer if by
ordinance of each municipality shall appoint a municipal agent for
[elderly persons] aging. Such agent (1) shall be a (A) staff member of a
senior center, [a] (B) member of an agency that serves [elderly persons]
older adults in the municipality, or [a] (C) responsible resident of the
municipality who has demonstrated an interest in assisting [elderly
persons] older adults or has been involved in programs in the field of
aging, and (2) shall not have a conflict of interest or a perceived conflict
of interest that may interfere with the municipal agent's ability to
provide unbiased information, assistance or referral services. Two or
more municipalities may jointly appoint one or more municipal agents
to carry out the duties and responsibilities of a municipal agent,
provided such municipalities enter into a memorandum of agreement
or understanding for such purpose, which may include, but need not be
SB124 / File No. 68 1

SB124 File No. 68
limited to, terms concerning the sharing of any expenses relating to the
municipal agent or agents.
(b) The duties of the municipal agent shall include, but need not be
limited to: (1) Disseminating information to [elderly persons] older
adults, assisting such persons in learning about the community
resources available to them and publicizing such resources and benefits;
(2) assisting [elderly persons] older adults in applying for federal and
state benefits, and accessing community resources, available to such
persons; and (3) reporting to the chief elected official or chief executive
officer of the municipality and the Department of Aging and Disability
Services any needs and problems of [the elderly] older adults and any
recommendations for action to improve services to [the elderly] older
adults. For the purposes of this subsection, "community resources"
means resources that assist [elderly persons] older adults in gaining
access to housing opportunities, including, but not limited to,
information regarding access to waitlists for housing designated for
[elderly persons] older adults, applications and consumer reports.
(c) Each municipal agent shall serve for a term of two or four years,
at the discretion of the appointing authority of each municipality, and
may be reappointed. If more than one agent is necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section, the appointing authority, in its discretion, may
appoint one or more assistant agents. The town clerk in each
municipality shall notify the Department of Aging and Disability
Services immediately of the appointment of a new municipal agent.
Each municipality may provide to its municipal agent resources
sufficient for such agent to perform the duties of the office.
(d) The Department of Aging and Disability Services shall adopt and
disseminate to municipalities guidelines as to the role and duties of
municipal agents and such informational and technical materials as may
assist such agents in performance of their duties. The department, in
cooperation with the area agencies on aging, may provide training for
municipal agents within the available resources of the department and
of the area agencies on aging.
SB124 / File No. 68 2

SB124 File No. 68
(e) On or before January 1, 2025, the Commissioner of Aging and
Disability Services shall create a directory of municipal agents
appointed pursuant to the provisions of this section, which shall
include, but need not be limited to, the name, title, telephone number,
electronic mail address and mailing address of each municipal agent.
The commissioner shall post a link to the directory on the Department
of Aging and Disability Services' Internet web site.
(f) On and after July 1, 2026, each municipal agent, at the time of such
municipal agent's appointment or reappointment, shall certify, in
writing, that such municipal agent is unaware of any conflict of interest
or perceived conflict of interest that may interfere with the municipal
agent's ability to provide unbiased information, assistance or referral
services and submit such certification to the Commissioner of Aging and
Disability Services in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner. If, during the term of a municipal agent, such a conflict
of interest or perceived conflict of interest arises, any interested party
may, and a municipal agent shall, immediately report such conflict of
interest or perceived conflict of interest to the appointing authority to
determine whether another municipal agent or municipal employee can
act in lieu of the affected municipal agent to nullify such conflict of
interest or perceived conflict of interest. The appointing authority may
consult with the Department of Aging and Disability Services in making
such determination. For the purposes of this subsection, the term
"conflict of interest" includes, but is not limited to, the receipt of any
financial or personal benefit by a municipal agent, such agent's spouse,
parent, sibling, child or child's spouse or a business associated with such
agent.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 7-127b
AGE Joint Favorable
SB124 / File No. 68 3

SB124 File No. 68
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Savings
Explanation
The bill results in potential savings beginning in FY 27 to
municipalities that choose to jointly appoint municipal agents for aging,
as expenses relating to the agents can now be shared across multiple
municipalities.
The bill also adds a requirement concerning conflicts of interest that
does not have a fiscal impact.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of municipalities that
choose to jointly appoint municipal agents for aging.
SB124 / File No. 68 4

SB124 File No. 68
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 124
AN ACT CONCERNING THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES' RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING
MUNICIPAL AGENTS FOR AGING.